Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 3 Transfer of Guardianship

29-2-69.
Minor’s move to a foreign jurisdiction; presumption of permanent move.

A guardian may petition a court of this state which has jurisdiction over the guardianship to transfer the guardianship to a foreign court of competent jurisdiction if the minor has moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction.

The minor may be presumed to have moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction if:

The minor has resided in the foreign jurisdiction for more than 12 consecutive months;

The guardian notifies the court that the minor will move or has moved permanently to the foreign jurisdiction; or

A foreign court of competent jurisdiction notifies the court of the filing of a petition for guardianship for the minor in the foreign jurisdiction.

To facilitate the transfer the court may order the guardian to file a petition for receipt and acceptance of the guardianship in the foreign jurisdiction.

If the foreign jurisdiction does not have a procedure for receiving and accepting a foreign guardianship, the court may order the guardian to file a petition for guardianship in the foreign jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-69

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-70.
Petition to transfer guardianship.

The petition to transfer a guardianship to a foreign jurisdiction shall include the following:

The name and address of the foreign court to which the guardianship shall be transferred and an authenticated copy of the petition for receipt and acceptance of a foreign guardianship if previously filed in the foreign court;

A listing of any other guardianship petitions that are pending in any jurisdiction and the names and addresses of the courts where the petitions have been filed;

The petitioner’s name, address, and county of domicile;

The name, age, and current address of the minor and the new or proposed address of the minor;

The names and current addresses of the adult siblings of the minor, if any;

The name and address of the person responsible for the care and custody of the minor, if other than the petitioner, and of any other individual currently serving as guardian;

The name and address of any legal representative, other than the petitioner, including any legal counsel, guardian ad litem, or court visitor appointed by the foreign court for the minor;

The name and address of the minor’s conservator, if any;

The reason for moving the minor; and

The reason the transfer of the guardianship is in the minor’s best interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-71.
Notice; requirements.

Notice and a copy of the petition to transfer a guardianship to a foreign jurisdiction shall be served personally on the minor not less than ten days prior to the date set for the hearing. The notice shall state:

The date that the hearing shall be held; and

That the minor has the right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint legal counsel for the minor unless the minor has retained counsel or legal counsel has been appointed by the foreign court to represent the minor in the receipt and acceptance of the guardianship.

Notice and a copy of the petition to transfer the guardianship shall be provided to the foreign court to which the guardianship is to be transferred.

Notice and a copy of the petition shall be mailed to all other persons named in the petition by first-class mail. The notice shall inform these persons of the date of the hearing and of their right to file objections to the transfer of the guardianship by this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-72.
Hearing.

On the court’s own motion or upon timely motion by the minor or by any interested person, the court shall hold a hearing to consider the petition to transfer the guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-73.
Required finds prior to transfer of guardianship; power of court; orderly and coordinated transfer.

The court may grant a petition to transfer a guardianship to a foreign court of competent jurisdiction if the court finds that the:

Guardian is presently in good standing with the court; and

Transfer of the guardianship to the foreign jurisdiction is in the best interest of the minor.

In order to coordinate efforts with the foreign court to facilitate the orderly transfer of the guardianship the court is authorized to:

Notify the foreign court of any significant problems that may have occurred, including whether periodic reports and accountings have been filed in a satisfactory manner and whether all bond or other security requirements imposed under the guardianship have been performed; and

Forward copies of all documents filed with the court relating to the guardianship, including but not limited to:

The initial petition for guardianship and other filings relevant to the appointment of the guardian;

Reports and recommendations of guardians ad litem, court visitors, or other individuals appointed by the court to evaluate the appropriateness of the guardianship;

Reports of physical and mental health practitioners describing the condition of the minor; and

Periodic status reports on the condition of the minor.

As necessary to coordinate the transfer of the guardianship, the court is authorized to:

Delay the effective date of the transfer for a reasonable period of time;

Make the transfer contingent upon the acceptance of the guardianship or appointment of the guardian in the foreign jurisdiction;

Recognize concurrent jurisdiction over the guardianship for a reasonable period of time to permit the foreign court to accept the guardianship or appoint the guardian in the foreign jurisdiction; or

Make other arrangements that in the sound discretion of the court are necessary to transfer the guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.